Utah statutes.
53A-8a-403.   Establishment of educator evaluation program -- Joint committee.

(1)  A local school board shall develop an educator evaluation program in consultation with its joint committee.

(2)  The joint committee described in Subsection (1) shall consist of an equal number of classroom teachers, parents, and administrators appointed by the local school board.

(3)  A local school board may appoint members of the joint committee from a list of nominees:

(a)  voted on by classroom teachers in a nomination election;

(b)  voted on by the administrators in a nomination election; and

(c)  of parents submitted by school community councils within the district.

(4)  Subject to Subsection (5), the joint committee may:

(a)  adopt or adapt an evaluation program for teachers based on a model developed by the State Board of Education; or

(b)  create its own evaluation program for teachers.

(5)  The evaluation program developed by the joint committee must comply with the requirements of this part and rules adopted by the State Board of Education under Section 53A-8a-409.

